Washington statutes.
RCW 11.84.130

Record of conviction as evidence against claimant of property.

Any record of conviction for having participated in the willful and unlawful killing of the decedent or for conduct constituting financial exploitation against the decedent, including but not limited to theft, forgery, fraud, identity theft, robbery, burglary, or extortion, shall be admissible in evidence against a claimant of property in any civil proceeding arising under this chapter.

[ 2009 c 525 s 13; 1965 c 145 s 11.84.130. Prior: 1955 c 141 s 13.]

NOTES:

Evidence, proof of public documents: Chapter 5.44 RCW; Rules of court: CR 44.